Utah, session 2026, HB435.
Section 1. Section 63G-34-101 is enacted to read:34. State Policies and Requirements63G-34-101. Reference to Judea and Samaria by a state agency.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Official government material" means any material prepared or produced by a state agency, whether written, printed, electronic, or in another medium, including:(i)a rule;(ii)a press release;(iii)a communication;(iv)a briefing;(v)guidance; or(vi)a publication.(b)"State agency" means a department, division, office, commission, or other institution of the state.(2)It is the policy of the state to refer to the land restored to Israel from Jordan during the 1967 Six-Day War, by the land's historical names of Judea and Samaria, with the land south of Jerusalem considered Judea and the land north of Jerusalem considered Samaria.(3)A state agency may not use the term "West Bank," or use state funds to create official government material that uses the term "West Bank," to refer to the land described in Subsection (2).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.